dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
  <!-- সংগঠিত; সংগঠিত -->
    <pardef n="সংগঠিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নিকটবর্তী; নিকটবর্তী -->
    <pardef n="নিকটবর্তী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- যথেষ্ট; যথেষ্ট -->
    <pardef n="যথেষ্ট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উন্নততম; উন্নত -->
    <pardef n="উন্নত/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- স্বরবর্ণ; স্বরবর্ণ -->
    <pardef n="স্বরবর্ণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উন্নততর; উন্নত -->
    <pardef n="উন্নত/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিভক্ত; বিভক্ত -->
    <pardef n="বিভক্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিরক্তিকর; বিরক্তিকর -->
    <pardef n="বিরক্তিকর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অটুট; অটুট -->
    <pardef n="অটুট__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আরোপিত; আরোপিত -->
    <pardef n="আরোপিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাহসী; সাহসী -->
    <pardef n="সাহসী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গঠনমূলক; গঠনমূলক -->
    <pardef n="গঠনমূলক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অপ্রত্যাশিত; অপ্রত্যাশিত -->
    <pardef n="অপ্রত্যাশিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নির্বাচিত; নির্বাচিত -->
    <pardef n="নির্বাচিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রবল; প্রবল -->
    <pardef n="প্রবল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গভীর; গভীর -->
    <pardef n="গভীর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নতুন; নতুন -->
    <pardef n="নতুন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উপদেষ্টা; উপদেষ্টা -->
    <pardef n="উপদেষ্টা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মুখ্য; মুখ্য -->
    <pardef n="মুখ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সন্তোষজনক; সন্তোষজনক -->
    <pardef n="সন্তোষজনক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ফেরার; ফেরার -->
    <pardef n="ফেরার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রথাগত; প্রথাগত -->
    <pardef n="প্রথাগত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কেবল; কেবল -->
    <pardef n="কেবল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সবুজ; সবুজ -->
    <pardef n="সবুজ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উপজাতীয়; উপজাতীয় -->
    <pardef n="উপজাতীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নকল; নকল -->
    <pardef n="নকল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রত্যাশিত; প্রত্যাশিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রত্যাশিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তুলনায়; তুলনায় -->
    <pardef n="তুলনায়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- চরম; চরম -->
    <pardef n="চরম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বৃহত্তম; বৃহত্তম -->
    <pardef n="বৃহত্তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সংক্ষিপ্ত; সংক্ষিপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="সংক্ষিপ্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- গোপন; গোপন -->
    <pardef n="গোপন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পার্বত্য; পার্বত্য -->
    <pardef n="পার্বত্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পর্তুগিজ; পর্তুগিজ -->
    <pardef n="পর্তুগিজ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ইউরোপীয়; ইউরোপীয় -->
    <pardef n="ইউরোপীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বাহ্যিক; বাহ্যিক -->
    <pardef n="বাহ্যিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বার্ষিক; বার্ষিক -->
    <pardef n="বার্ষিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ক্ষুদ্র; ক্ষুদ্র -->
    <pardef n="ক্ষুদ্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- শীতল; শীতল -->
    <pardef n="শীতল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঘোষিত; ঘোষিত -->
    <pardef n="ঘোষিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মধ্য; মধ্য -->
    <pardef n="মধ্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অদম্য; অদম্য -->
    <pardef n="অদম্য__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সমকালীন; সমকালীন -->
    <pardef n="সমকালীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- দক্ষিণ; দক্ষিণ -->
    <pardef n="দক্ষিণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="সংগঠিত"><i>সংগঠিত</i><par n="সংগঠিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নিকটবর্তী"><i>নিকটবর্তী</i><par n="নিকটবর্তী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="যথেষ্ট"><i>যথেষ্ট</i><par n="যথেষ্ট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উন্নততম"><i>উন্নত</i><par n="উন্নত/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="স্বরবর্ণ"><i>স্বরবর্ণ</i><par n="স্বরবর্ণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উন্নততর"><i>উন্নত</i><par n="উন্নত/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিভক্ত"><i>বিভক্ত</i><par n="বিভক্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিরক্তিকর"><i>বিরক্তিকর</i><par n="বিরক্তিকর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অটুট"><i>অটুট</i><par n="অটুট__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আরোপিত"><i>আরোপিত</i><par n="আরোপিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাহসী"><i>সাহসী</i><par n="সাহসী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গঠনমূলক"><i>গঠনমূলক</i><par n="গঠনমূলক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অপ্রত্যাশিত"><i>অপ্রত্যাশিত</i><par n="অপ্রত্যাশিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নির্বাচিত"><i>নির্বাচিত</i><par n="নির্বাচিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রবল"><i>প্রবল</i><par n="প্রবল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গভীর"><i>গভীর</i><par n="গভীর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নতুন"><i>নতুন</i><par n="নতুন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উপদেষ্টা"><i>উপদেষ্টা</i><par n="উপদেষ্টা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মুখ্য"><i>মুখ্য</i><par n="মুখ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সন্তোষজনক"><i>সন্তোষজনক</i><par n="সন্তোষজনক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ফেরার"><i>ফেরার</i><par n="ফেরার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রথাগত"><i>প্রথাগত</i><par n="প্রথাগত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কেবল"><i>কেবল</i><par n="কেবল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সবুজ"><i>সবুজ</i><par n="সবুজ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উপজাতীয়"><i>উপজাতীয়</i><par n="উপজাতীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নকল"><i>নকল</i><par n="নকল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রত্যাশিত"><i>প্রত্যাশিত</i><par n="প্রত্যাশিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তুলনায়"><i>তুলনায়</i><par n="তুলনায়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="চরম"><i>চরম</i><par n="চরম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বৃহত্তম"><i>বৃহত্তম</i><par n="বৃহত্তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সংক্ষিপ্ত"><i>সংক্ষিপ্ত</i><par n="সংক্ষিপ্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="গোপন"><i>গোপন</i><par n="গোপন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পার্বত্য"><i>পার্বত্য</i><par n="পার্বত্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পর্তুগিজ"><i>পর্তুগিজ</i><par n="পর্তুগিজ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ইউরোপীয়"><i>ইউরোপীয়</i><par n="ইউরোপীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাহ্যিক"><i>বাহ্যিক</i><par n="বাহ্যিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বার্ষিক"><i>বার্ষিক</i><par n="বার্ষিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ক্ষুদ্র"><i>ক্ষুদ্র</i><par n="ক্ষুদ্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="শীতল"><i>শীতল</i><par n="শীতল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঘোষিত"><i>ঘোষিত</i><par n="ঘোষিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মধ্য"><i>মধ্য</i><par n="মধ্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অদম্য"><i>অদম্য</i><par n="অদম্য__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সমকালীন"><i>সমকালীন</i><par n="সমকালীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="দক্ষিণ"><i>দক্ষিণ</i><par n="দক্ষিণ__adj"/></e>
